test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N9
+N9:jypa	Cases ;
+N9:jlxå	Cases ;
+N9:jväm	Cases ;
+N9:jmgc	Cases ;
+N9:jbcj	Cases ;
+N9:joet	Cases ;
+N9:jkoq	Cases ;
+N9:jäua	Cases ;
+N9:jrws	Cases ;
+N9:jpzt	Cases ;
+N9:joci	Cases ;
+N9:jäon	Cases ;
+N9:jtåf	Cases ;
+N9:jpwi	Cases ;
+N9:jbon	Cases ;
+N9:jqyh	Cases ;
+N9:jxjp	Cases ;
+N9:jeee	Cases ;
+N9:jrry	Cases ;
+N9:jdco	Cases ;
+N9:jjfv	Cases ;
+N9:jkhm	Cases ;
+N9:jrby	Cases ;
+N9:jrhö	Cases ;
+N9:jaix	Cases ;
+N9:julv	Cases ;
+N9:jhfy	Cases ;
+N9:jtfc	Cases ;
+N9:jläd	Cases ;
+N9:jqkd	Cases ;
+N9:jxjb	Cases ;
+N9:jktv	Cases ;
+N9:jpeä	Cases ;
+N9:jitm	Cases ;
+N9:jgpb	Cases ;
+N9:jdod	Cases ;
+N9:jczr	Cases ;
+N9:jkip	Cases ;
+N9:jyqc	Cases ;
+N9:jwsc	Cases ;
+N9:jåqu	Cases ;
+N9:jböv	Cases ;
+N9:jyte	Cases ;
+N9:jkåm	Cases ;
+N9:jqps	Cases ;
+N9:jdfr	Cases ;
+N9:jmct	Cases ;
+N9:jxlf	Cases ;
+N9:jpiu	Cases ;
+N9:jnam	Cases ;
+N9:jovt	Cases ;
+N9:jzhl	Cases ;
+N9:jewf	Cases ;
+N9:jeum	Cases ;
+N9:jfiä	Cases ;
+N9:jvdb	Cases ;
+N9:jfry	Cases ;
+N9:jwzf	Cases ;
+N9:jisu	Cases ;
+N9:jdoä	Cases ;
+N9:jeeg	Cases ;
+N9:jbxq	Cases ;
+N9:jhwn	Cases ;
+N9:jror	Cases ;
+N9:jpnå	Cases ;
+N9:juvl	Cases ;
+N9:jqgo	Cases ;
+N9:jjxc	Cases ;
+N9:jtåx	Cases ;
+N9:jkvz	Cases ;
+N9:jlto	Cases ;
+N9:jåez	Cases ;
+N9:javt	Cases ;
+N9:jyny	Cases ;
+N9:jåyf	Cases ;
+N9:jcäb	Cases ;
+N9:jtbz	Cases ;
+N9:jbdd	Cases ;
+N9:jöäb	Cases ;
+N9:jvnp	Cases ;
+N9:jaui	Cases ;
+N9:jnez	Cases ;
+N9:jirh	Cases ;
+N9:jwct	Cases ;
+N9:jzpw	Cases ;
+N9:jakk	Cases ;
+N9:jhrb	Cases ;
+N9:jqåj	Cases ;
+N9:jfök	Cases ;
+N9:jhjl	Cases ;
+N9:jodå	Cases ;
+N9:jhdi	Cases ;
+N9:jzöz	Cases ;
+N9:jejf	Cases ;
+N9:jxht	Cases ;
+N9:jpte	Cases ;
+N9:jgoy	Cases ;
+N9:juöö	Cases ;
+N9:jnng	Cases ;


LEXICON N10
+N1%0:kviq	Cases ;
+N1%0:ktkm	Cases ;
+N1%0:kgqb	Cases ;
+N1%0:kccs	Cases ;
+N1%0:koön	Cases ;
+N1%0:kirn	Cases ;
+N1%0:ktuu	Cases ;
+N1%0:kröw	Cases ;
+N1%0:khci	Cases ;
+N1%0:kcxg	Cases ;
+N1%0:kgep	Cases ;
+N1%0:kdor	Cases ;
+N1%0:kåuy	Cases ;
+N1%0:kolw	Cases ;
+N1%0:klfr	Cases ;
+N1%0:kner	Cases ;
+N1%0:kprp	Cases ;
+N1%0:kuxh	Cases ;
+N1%0:käöf	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyon	Cases ;
+N1%0:kwpe	Cases ;
+N1%0:kiee	Cases ;
+N1%0:kfkp	Cases ;
+N1%0:kpjv	Cases ;
+N1%0:keme	Cases ;
+N1%0:keuj	Cases ;
+N1%0:kjio	Cases ;
+N1%0:köpu	Cases ;
+N1%0:köft	Cases ;
+N1%0:kåum	Cases ;
+N1%0:kmlt	Cases ;
+N1%0:kynö	Cases ;
+N1%0:kvtö	Cases ;
+N1%0:kzkc	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyjv	Cases ;
+N1%0:kubq	Cases ;
+N1%0:kjyg	Cases ;
+N1%0:khjö	Cases ;
+N1%0:kqås	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyrm	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyph	Cases ;
+N1%0:kqöx	Cases ;
+N1%0:kdho	Cases ;
+N1%0:kosh	Cases ;
+N1%0:ksyn	Cases ;
+N1%0:kinu	Cases ;
+N1%0:kåzb	Cases ;
+N1%0:ksåa	Cases ;
+N1%0:kwmr	Cases ;
+N1%0:klmz	Cases ;
+N1%0:kiäs	Cases ;
+N1%0:körk	Cases ;
+N1%0:knha	Cases ;
+N1%0:kljn	Cases ;
+N1%0:klwn	Cases ;
+N1%0:kipö	Cases ;
+N1%0:kcna	Cases ;
+N1%0:kwdö	Cases ;
+N1%0:kymj	Cases ;
+N1%0:kånt	Cases ;
+N1%0:kgja	Cases ;
+N1%0:kcgr	Cases ;
+N1%0:ktje	Cases ;
+N1%0:keeq	Cases ;
+N1%0:kqdt	Cases ;
+N1%0:kpdo	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyxå	Cases ;
+N1%0:ksbö	Cases ;
+N1%0:krax	Cases ;
+N1%0:kwhb	Cases ;
+N1%0:kjwn	Cases ;
+N1%0:klti	Cases ;
+N1%0:kqsb	Cases ;
+N1%0:kömq	Cases ;
+N1%0:kmzs	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyza	Cases ;
+N1%0:koom	Cases ;
+N1%0:kbäs	Cases ;
+N1%0:kvtj	Cases ;
+N1%0:keqj	Cases ;
+N1%0:kwli	Cases ;
+N1%0:keja	Cases ;
+N1%0:ksåc	Cases ;
+N1%0:kträ	Cases ;
+N1%0:kkbg	Cases ;
+N1%0:ktus	Cases ;
+N1%0:käeb	Cases ;
+N1%0:krgg	Cases ;
+N1%0:kåen	Cases ;
+N1%0:knqq	Cases ;
+N1%0:kmhm	Cases ;
+N1%0:kdfw	Cases ;
+N1%0:kgjh	Cases ;
+N1%0:köni	Cases ;
+N1%0:klhk	Cases ;
+N1%0:kmoy	Cases ;
+N1%0:kdcp	Cases ;
+N1%0:kyfå	Cases ;
+N1%0:kahg	Cases ;


LEXICON N11
+N11:ldyy	Cases ;
+N11:ljän	Cases ;
+N11:lsåå	Cases ;
+N11:ljåq	Cases ;
+N11:lgpo	Cases ;
+N11:lqpö	Cases ;
+N11:liqp	Cases ;
+N11:loki	Cases ;
+N11:lpså	Cases ;
+N11:lpsg	Cases ;
+N11:loqy	Cases ;
+N11:lpåc	Cases ;
+N11:lkng	Cases ;
+N11:lszg	Cases ;
+N11:lstd	Cases ;
+N11:lanö	Cases ;
+N11:lhwl	Cases ;
+N11:ldgi	Cases ;
+N11:lccg	Cases ;
+N11:lmzl	Cases ;
+N11:lxta	Cases ;
+N11:latd	Cases ;
+N11:lcid	Cases ;
+N11:ldmd	Cases ;
+N11:ldhr	Cases ;
+N11:loby	Cases ;
+N11:logm	Cases ;
+N11:lbld	Cases ;
+N11:lpcd	Cases ;
+N11:lfrv	Cases ;
+N11:lrpx	Cases ;
+N11:lgwr	Cases ;
+N11:lfiö	Cases ;
+N11:lbvr	Cases ;
+N11:ldov	Cases ;
+N11:lynj	Cases ;
+N11:lnyw	Cases ;
+N11:löta	Cases ;
+N11:liwn	Cases ;
+N11:lpwf	Cases ;
+N11:lbcu	Cases ;
+N11:lyco	Cases ;
+N11:linn	Cases ;
+N11:lvky	Cases ;
+N11:leou	Cases ;
+N11:lcxi	Cases ;
+N11:lmaj	Cases ;
+N11:ldxb	Cases ;
+N11:lsjj	Cases ;
+N11:lhdc	Cases ;
+N11:läås	Cases ;
+N11:ldue	Cases ;
+N11:läåk	Cases ;
+N11:lkke	Cases ;
+N11:lovb	Cases ;
+N11:lzgs	Cases ;
+N11:ljmk	Cases ;
+N11:lwaq	Cases ;
+N11:lmbl	Cases ;
+N11:läxw	Cases ;
+N11:lywn	Cases ;
+N11:lnmö	Cases ;
+N11:ldbt	Cases ;
+N11:lojä	Cases ;
+N11:lbzw	Cases ;
+N11:lrpo	Cases ;
+N11:lofe	Cases ;
+N11:lbct	Cases ;
+N11:lter	Cases ;
+N11:lflw	Cases ;
+N11:lbpp	Cases ;
+N11:lhll	Cases ;
+N11:ljfk	Cases ;
+N11:lbvk	Cases ;
+N11:lfpä	Cases ;
+N11:lqöi	Cases ;
+N11:lric	Cases ;
+N11:ldat	Cases ;
+N11:lcwy	Cases ;
+N11:lawe	Cases ;
+N11:ltes	Cases ;
+N11:lzsv	Cases ;
+N11:löös	Cases ;
+N11:luzp	Cases ;
+N11:lgxt	Cases ;
+N11:lyäb	Cases ;
+N11:lärp	Cases ;
+N11:lngö	Cases ;
+N11:lädz	Cases ;
+N11:lpiå	Cases ;
+N11:lwäg	Cases ;
+N11:luok	Cases ;
+N11:ljag	Cases ;
+N11:ltwb	Cases ;
+N11:lbhk	Cases ;
+N11:lnsp	Cases ;
+N11:lybx	Cases ;
+N11:lvgg	Cases ;
+N11:lebj	Cases ;


LEXICON N12
+N12:mexx	Cases ;
+N12:mize	Cases ;
+N12:mgzl	Cases ;
+N12:mxfa	Cases ;
+N12:mjåu	Cases ;
+N12:mryk	Cases ;
+N12:mkta	Cases ;
+N12:munu	Cases ;
+N12:mygn	Cases ;
+N12:mlsq	Cases ;
+N12:mcög	Cases ;
+N12:mjbi	Cases ;
+N12:mycd	Cases ;
+N12:myöo	Cases ;
+N12:muse	Cases ;
+N12:mprä	Cases ;
+N12:mbca	Cases ;
+N12:mnqi	Cases ;
+N12:mxpa	Cases ;
+N12:mxsg	Cases ;
+N12:mtyu	Cases ;
+N12:mmws	Cases ;
+N12:mcdä	Cases ;
+N12:måsq	Cases ;
+N12:mmta	Cases ;
+N12:mölc	Cases ;
+N12:mjöö	Cases ;
+N12:musl	Cases ;
+N12:mift	Cases ;
+N12:mbar	Cases ;
+N12:mäpu	Cases ;
+N12:mbga	Cases ;
+N12:mewe	Cases ;
+N12:måat	Cases ;
+N12:mdjw	Cases ;
+N12:myvy	Cases ;
+N12:mvwi	Cases ;
+N12:mojv	Cases ;
+N12:mxnö	Cases ;
+N12:mpwä	Cases ;
+N12:måqz	Cases ;
+N12:mojr	Cases ;
+N12:mlzö	Cases ;
+N12:mnöl	Cases ;
+N12:mean	Cases ;
+N12:måcr	Cases ;
+N12:mrwg	Cases ;
+N12:mbmö	Cases ;
+N12:mviv	Cases ;
+N12:mkwo	Cases ;
+N12:modn	Cases ;
+N12:mqqt	Cases ;
+N12:mdvv	Cases ;
+N12:mcät	Cases ;
+N12:mqsu	Cases ;
+N12:mjkf	Cases ;
+N12:mgcp	Cases ;
+N12:mhcj	Cases ;
+N12:mgmå	Cases ;
+N12:måfi	Cases ;
+N12:mcre	Cases ;
+N12:mopn	Cases ;
+N12:mzti	Cases ;
+N12:mfrr	Cases ;
+N12:mhgh	Cases ;
+N12:mkgj	Cases ;
+N12:mgaz	Cases ;
+N12:mckm	Cases ;
+N12:mvqs	Cases ;
+N12:mrex	Cases ;
+N12:mybi	Cases ;
+N12:mneq	Cases ;
+N12:mvjs	Cases ;
+N12:mzab	Cases ;
+N12:mrrx	Cases ;
+N12:mtxd	Cases ;
+N12:mets	Cases ;
+N12:mqmt	Cases ;
+N12:mösf	Cases ;
+N12:mimd	Cases ;
+N12:mjzv	Cases ;
+N12:mlbk	Cases ;
+N12:mecx	Cases ;
+N12:mnei	Cases ;
+N12:mnbt	Cases ;
+N12:mzcp	Cases ;
+N12:mxkh	Cases ;
+N12:mhaj	Cases ;
+N12:mosö	Cases ;
+N12:mebr	Cases ;
+N12:möbc	Cases ;
+N12:mgtx	Cases ;
+N12:muon	Cases ;
+N12:moåx	Cases ;
+N12:mtww	Cases ;
+N12:magb	Cases ;
+N12:meep	Cases ;
+N12:mhml	Cases ;
+N12:mbqb	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
i N9 ;
j N10 ;
k N11 ;
l N12 ;
